Idaho, session 2025, H0277.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-827A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-827A. POWERS AND DUTIES. The office of information technology ser-
vices is hereby authorized and directed:
(1)(a)(i) To control and approve the acquisition and installa-
tion of all telecommunications equipment and facilities for all
departments and institutions of state government, except as pro-
vided in subparagraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this paragraph;
(ii) To coordinate the acquisition and installation of all
telecommunications equipment and facilities for the institutions
of higher education and the elected officers in the executive
branch;
(iii) To coordinate the acquisition and installation of all
telecommunications equipment and facilities for the legislative
and judicial branches;
(iv) Provided however, that the acquisition and installation of
all public safety and microwave equipment shall be under the con-
trol of the military division. The military division is autho-
rized to charge and receive payment for actual and necessary ex-
penses incurred in providing services to any unit of state govern-
ment under the provisions of this subparagraph.
(b) In approving or coordinating the acquisition or installation of
telecommunications equipment or facilities, the office shall first
consult with and consider the recommendations and advice of the direc-
tors or executive heads of the various departments or institutions.
Any acquisition or installation of any telecommunications equipment or
facilities that is contrary to the office's recommendation, or is not
in harmony with the state's overall plan for telecommunications and in-
formation sharing, shall be reported in writing to the governor and the
legislature.
(2) To provide a system of telecommunications for all departments and
institutions of state government. Funds received pursuant to this subsec-
tion shall be appropriated for payment of telecommunication and telephone
charges incurred by the various agencies and institutions of state govern-
ment.


(3) To provide a means whereby political subdivisions of the state may
use the state telecommunications system, upon such terms and under such con-
ditions as the office of information technology services may establish.
(4) To accept federal funds granted by congress or by executive order
for all or any of the purposes of this chapter, as well as gifts and donations
from individuals and private organizations or foundations.
(5) To oversee implementation of cybersecurity policies to foster risk
and cybersecurity management telecommunications and decision-making with
both internal and external organizational stakeholders.
(6) To coordinate and consult with state agencies and officials regard-
ing information security needs.
(7) To coordinate with state agencies and officials on penetration
tests and vulnerability scans of state technology systems in order to iden-
tify steps to mitigate identified risks.
(8) To coordinate with state agencies and officials to ensure that
state agencies implement mandatory education and training of state em-
ployees and provide guidance on appropriate levels of training for various
classifications of state employees.
(9) To coordinate with appropriate state agencies to create, coordi-
nate, publish, routinely update and market a statewide cybersecurity web-
site as an information repository for intelligence-sharing and cybersecu-
rity best practices.
(10) To coordinate public and private entities to develop, create and
promote statewide public outreach efforts to protect personal information
and sensitive data from cyber threats.
(11)(a) To obtain a criminal history check on prospective employees and
contractors with the Idaho office of information technology services
who provide information technology (IT) services to external state
agency customers and who work in one (1) or more of the following disci-
plines:
(i) IT network engineering;
(ii) IT operations and support;
(iii) IT software engineering;
(iv) Geographic information systems;
(v) IT information management;
(vi) IT database administration;
(vii) IT systems and infrastructure engineering;
(viii) IT information security engineering;
(ix) IT architecture;
(x) IT management;
(xi) Remote sensing analysis; and
(xii) Data science.
(b) The criminal history check done pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be based on a completed ten (10) finger fingerprint
card or scan and shall include, at a minimum, information from the Idaho
bureau of criminal identification database and the federal bureau of
investigation's criminal history database.
(c) For the purposes of this section, "information technology" shall
have the same meaning as provided for in section 67-831, Idaho Code.


(11) (12) To promulgate and adopt reasonable rules, subject to legisla-
tive approval, for effecting the purposes of this act pursuant to the provi-
sions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.